Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2206.01
Fine and costs; payment of installments; violation; penalty; hearing.

Installments provided for in section 29-2206 shall be paid pursuant to the order entered by the court or magistrate. Any person who fails to comply with the terms of such order shall be liable for punishment for contempt, unless such person has the leave of the court or magistrate in regard to such noncompliance or such person requests a hearing pursuant to section 29-2412 and establishes at such hearing that he or she is financially unable to pay.

Laws 1971, LB 1010, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB259, § 6.